src-fst-morphology-stems-verbalnouns.lexc.md
# Verbal nouns
Ainm Briathra & Aidiacht Briathra - 
Verbal Nouns & Verbal Adjectives
- E Uí Dhonnchadha
2003 
- Nov 2005 version 3 
Updated May 2008
- verbal nouns have vn lemma rather than verb lemma
verbal noun gen is same as verbal adj except for new vns ending in -áil
and some other e.g. úsáide, úsáidte 
CW manually checked Foclóir Póca entries and added FGB entries
- Updated Dec 2018: reorganised and verbal nouns have verb lemma again

-  **LEXICON VerbalNounsV** 
-  ábhraigh+Verbal+Noun+VI:ábhrú VN-INIT;
-  achainigh+Verbal+Noun+VTI:achainí VN-INIT;
-  achair+Verbal+Noun+VTI:achairt VN-INIT;
-  achoimrigh+Verbal+Noun+VT:achoimriú VN-INIT;
-  achtáil+Verbal+Noun+VT:achtáil VN-INIT;
-  achtaigh+Verbal+Noun+VT:achtú VN-INIT;
-  aclaigh+Verbal+Noun+VTI:aclú VN-INIT;
-  adamhaigh+Verbal+Noun+VT:adamhú VN-INIT;
-  adhain+Verbal+Noun+VTI:adhaint VN-INIT;
etc... appro 7400 stems

NOTE: 'druideadh' is commented out since it was not found as a verbal noun
in the corpus, yet chances are that it would get mixed up with 'druideadh'
as independed form of 'druid', i.e. 'ó druideadh an scoil'

INCLUDED HERE AS THEY ARE NOT SHARED WITH ANY OTHER POS
**LEXICON VN-INIT**
- #;
- +Len:^IM^Sé #;
- +Ecl:^IM^Urú #;
- +hPref:^IM^hv #;

**LEXICON VA-INIT**
- #;
- +Len:^IM^Sé #;

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/verbalnouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-gle/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/verbalnouns.lexc)</small>
